Massachusetts, session 194th, H4315.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1
Notwithstanding section 58A of Chapter 31 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, no person shall be eligible to have their name certified for original
appointment to the position of firefighter in the City of Westfield if such person has reached their
fortieth birthday on the date of the entrance examination.
of 1